Utah statutes.
63J-1-701.   Request for in-depth budget review of agency or program -- Form of budget submitted.

The Legislative Management Committee, upon recommendation of an appropriations subcommittee of the Legislature, may request of the governor for any designated fiscal year, an in-depth budget review of any state department, agency, institution, or program.  When responding to a request for an in-depth budget review, the governor shall submit for the department, agency, institution, or program for the fiscal year indicated a budget prepared in accordance with Section 63J-1-702 and using the format and procedures developed by the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget in cooperation with the legislative fiscal analyst.  This format shall be constructed to assist the analyst and the Legislature in reviewing the justification for selected departments, agencies, and institutions or any of their programs and activities.

